Maine, session 132, LD20.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 4 MRSA §153, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2003, c. 673, Pt. JJJ, §3, is further
amended to read:
2. Androscoggin. Androscoggin consists of all municipalities in Androscoggin
County. The District Court for Androscoggin must be held at Lewiston or Auburn, exact
site to be determined by the Chief Judge.
Sec. 2. 4 MRSA §153, sub-§3, as amended by PL 1995, c. 330, §1, is further
amended to read:
3. Western Aroostook. Western Aroostook consists of the municipalities and
unorganized territory known as Hamlin Plt. Plantation, Cyr Plt. Plantation, T17 R3, T17
R4, T16 R5, T15 R6, Winterville Plt. Plantation, T15 R8, T15 R9, T14 R10, T14 R11, T14
R12, T14 R13, T14 R14, T14 R15, T14 R16, and all municipalities and unorganized
territory in Aroostook County lying to the west and north of these. The District Court for
Western Aroostook must be held at Madawaska and Fort Kent. The Chief Judge shall
determine the level of service at each location.
Sec. 3. 4 MRSA §154, sub-§1, as amended by PL 1965, c. 228, §2, is further
amended to read:
1. First District. The first district consists of the divisions of Eastern Aroostook
(Caribou) and Western Aroostook (Madawaska, Fort Kent and Van Buren).
Sec. 4. 4 MRSA §154, sub-§8, as amended by PL 2003, c. 673, Pt. JJJ, §4, is further
amended to read:
8. Eighth District. The 8th district consists of the divisions division of Androscoggin
(Lewiston).
Sec. 5. Reallocation of Western Aroostook and Eastern Aroostook judicial
divisions. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 4, section 153, subsections
3 and 4, for the convenience of the public, the Chief Judge of the District Court may, by
Page 1 - 132LR0279(03)

order, which may from time to time be amended or repealed, reallocate any municipality
or unorganized territory between the Western Aroostook and Eastern Aroostook judicial
divisions. Copies of the order must be posted on the judicial branch's publicly accessible
website.
Sec. 6. Report. By January 15, 2026, the Chief Judge of the District Court shall
submit a report to the Joint Standing Committee on Judiciary with any recommendations
for redrawing the geographic boundaries between any of the judicial divisions set forth in
the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 4, section 153. The committee may report out legislation
based on the report to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature.
Sec. 7. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides ongoing deappropriations due to the closure of the district court in
Madawaska.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($5,416) ($6,500)
All Other ($38,640) ($46,368)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($44,056) ($52,868)
Page 2 - 132LR0279(03)